Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0210.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 45a. (1) Subject to subsection (2), a person shall not knowingly and intentionally use an unmanned aircraft in a manner that interferes with the operations of a any of the following: (a) A key facility. , a (b) A fire station or other firefighting facility. (c) A correctional facility , or other law enforcement facility. (d) A hospital or emergency medical facility. (e) A dam. (f) A nuclear reactor. (g) A critical manufacturing facility. (h) A commercial facility. (i) Any government-owned facility. (2) If a facility listed under subsection (1) is included on the Federal Aviation Administration's registry of fixed site facilities under section 2209 of the FAA extension, safety, and security act of 2016, Public Law 114-190, a person shall not fly or cause an unmanned aircraft to hover over the facility. (3) A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years or a fine of not more than $2,500.00, or both. (4) This section does not apply to a commercial operator of an unmanned aircraft if the unmanned aircraft is operated pursuant to and in compliance with Federal Aviation Administration regulations, authorizations, and exemptions. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Commercial facility" means a facility that is part of the commercial facilities sector as described in Presidential Policy Directive 21 (PPD-21): Critical Infrastructure Security and Resilience, including facilities in the subsectors of entertainment and media, gaming, casinos, outdoor events, public assembly, real estate, retail, and sports leagues. (b) "Critical manufacturing facility" means a facility that is part of the critical manufacturing sector as described in Presidential Policy Directive 21 (PPD-21): Critical Infrastructure Security and Resilience, including facilities related to primary metals manufacturing, machine manufacturing, electrical equipment, appliance, and component manufacturing, and transportation equipment manufacturing. (c) (a) "Key facility" means that term as defined in section 552c. (d) (b) "Unmanned aircraft" means that term as defined in section 3 of the unmanned aircraft systems act, 2016 PA 436, MCL 259.303.